Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-342
Owner, defined.

Owner means a person, firm, or
corporation which holds a legal title of a motor vehicle or trailer. If (1)
a motor vehicle or trailer is the subject of an agreement for the conditional
sale thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions
stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in
the conditional vendee, (2) a motor vehicle or trailer is subject to a lease
of thirty days or more with an immediate right of possession vested in the
lessee, or (3) a mortgagor of a motor vehicle or trailer is entitled to possession,
then such conditional vendee, lessee, or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner
for purposes of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.

Laws
2005, LB 274, § 42;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 9.